Utah statutes.
20A-11-305 (Superseded 01/01/11).   Legislative office candidate -- Failure
to file report -- Name not printed on ballot -- Filling vacancy.
(1) (a)  If a legislative office candidate fails to file an interim report due
before the regular primary election, on August 31, or before the regular
general election, the lieutenant governor shall, after making a reasonable
attempt to discover if the report was timely mailed, inform the county clerk
and other appropriate election officials who:
(i)  shall, if practicable, remove the name of the candidate by blacking out
the candidate's name before the ballots are delivered to voters; or
(ii)  shall, if removing the candidate's name from the ballot is not
practicable, inform the voters by any practicable method that the candidate
has been disqualified and that votes cast for the candidate will not be
counted; and
(iii)  may not count any votes for that candidate.
(b)  Any legislative office candidate who fails to file timely a financial
statement required by Section 20A-11-303 is disqualified and the vacancy on
the ballot may be filled as provided in Section 20A-1-501.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b), a legislative office
candidate is not disqualified if:
(i)  the candidate files the reports required by this section no later than
the due date;
(ii)  those reports are completed, detailing accurately and completely the
information required by this part except for inadvertent omissions or
insignificant errors or inaccuracies; and
(iii)  those omissions, errors, or inaccuracies are corrected in an amended
report or in the next scheduled report.
(2) (a)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of a summary report,
the lieutenant governor shall review each filed summary report to ensure that:
(i)  each legislative office candidate that is required to file a summary
report has filed one; and
(ii)  each summary report contains the information required by this part.
(b)  If it appears that any legislative office candidate has failed to file
the summary report required by law, if it appears that a filed summary report
does not conform to the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a
written complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any
summary report, the lieutenant governor shall, within five days of discovery
of a violation or receipt of a written complaint, notify the legislative
office candidate of the violation or written complaint and direct the
legislative office candidate to file a summary report correcting the problem.
(c) (i)  It is unlawful for any legislative office candidate to fail to file
or amend a summary report within 14 days after receiving notice from the
lieutenant governor under this section.
(ii)  Each legislative office candidate who violates Subsection (2)(c)(i) is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(iii)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection
(2)(c)(i) to the attorney general.
